New York, session 2025-2026, S6859.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1202-hh of the tax law, as added by chapter 469 of 2 the laws of 2022, is renumbered section 1202-hh-2. 3 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 469 of the laws of 2022, relating to author- 4 izing the imposition of an occupancy tax in the village of Nyack, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire December 7 31, [2025] 2027, when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 8 deemed repealed. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 10 the amendments to section 1202-hh of the tax law made by section one of 11 this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed 12 repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10928-03-5